src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON_21MONI
:i Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG_GEN ;
:%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG_ALL_lE-STEM ;
+Sg+Par:%{back%}%>d%{aä%} K ;
:%{back%} Harm_Neutr_SG_PAR_d ;

:%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
:%{back%}%>i PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;

LEXICON Interrogative
!veid́oq+Pron:veid́oq PRON_11 "_ˋveit́o, veid́ot, %{ˋØ%}veit́(o)idõ, %{ˋØ%}veit́oid, %{ˋØ%}veitit__veid́oq_" ;
veidüq+Pron:vei%{td%}ü PRON_11LAETEQ "_ˋveitü, veidüt, %{ˋØ%}veit(ü)ide, %{ˋØ%}veitüid, %{ˋØ%}veitit __veidüq_" ;
!sääre+Pron:sääre PRON_13 "_ˋsäärtse, säärest__sääre_" ;
määndene+Pron:%{ˋØ%}#mäände PRON_13TAEHINE "_#dse, #st__ˋmäände|ne_" ;
määräne+Pron:määrä PRON_13TAEHINE "_#dse, #st__määrä|ne_" ;
määne+Pron:%{ˋØ%}#mää PRON_13SAEAENE"_#dse, #st__ˋmää|ne_" ;
niisääne+Pron:niisää PRON_13SAEAENE"_#%{ˋØ%}sääntse #%{ˋØ%}säändse #%{ˋØ%}sändse, #säänest__nii|sääne_" ;
sääne+Pron:sää PRON_13SAEAENE"_ˋsääntse %{ˋØ%}säändse %{ˋØ%}sändse, säänest__sääne_" ;
!määne+Pron:määne PRON_14 "_ˋmääntse %{ˋØ%}mändse, määnest__määne_" ;
!määres+Pron:määre%{sØ%} PRON_14 "_ˋmäärtse %{ˋØ%}märdse, määrest__määres_" ;
säändene+Pron:%{ˋØ%}#säände PRON_19PEDAEJAENE "_#dse, #st__ˋsäände|ne_" ;
säänedäne+Pron:säänedä PRON_19PEDAEJAENE "_#dse, #st__säänedä|ne_" ;
säärdene+Pron:%{ˋØ%}#säärde PRON_19PEDAEJAENE "_#dse, #st__ˋsäärde|ne_" ;
mõni+Pron:mõ̭n PRON_21MONI "_mõ̭nõ, %{ˋØ%}mõ̭nda mõ̭nt__mõ̭ni_" ;
palĺokõnõ+Pron:palĺokõ PRON_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__palĺokõ|nõ_" ;
palĺo+Pron:palĺo PRON_PALL1O ; ! CHECKME
pisokõnõ+Pron:pisokõ PRON_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist __pisokõ|nõ_" ;
tuukõnõ+Pron:tu̬u̬kõ PRON_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__tu̬u̬kõ|nõ_" ;
tõnõ+Pron:tõ̭ PRON_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__tõ̭|nõ_" ;
veid́okõnõ+Pron:veid́okõ PRON_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__veid́okõ|nõ_" ;
veidükene+Pron:veidüke PRON_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist__veidüke|ne_" ;
veit́kene+Pron:%{ˋØ%}#veit́ke PRON_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist__ˋveit́ke|ne_" ;
vähäkene+Pron:vähäke PRON_22VAEHAEKENE "_#se, #ist__vähäke|ne_" ;
tõõnõ+Pron:tõõ PRON_22NAANW "_#õsõ, #ist__tõ|õnõ_" ;
!!tõnõtõsõ+Pron:tõ̭nõtõsõ PRON_22 "_õ tõ̭nõtõist__tõ̭nõtõs_" ;
!!tõõnõtõõsõ+Pron:tõõnõtõõsõ PRON_22 "_tõõnõtõist__tõõnõtõõsõ_" ;
mitu+Pron:mit PRON_27MITU "_ˋmitmõ, mitund__mitu_" ;
muu+Pron:muu PRON_29KUU "_#, #d__muu_" ;
muu+Pron:m%{ou%}%{ou%} PRON_30MAA "_#, #d__mu̬u̬_" ;
kõiḱ+Pron:kõ̭i%{kØ%}%{kḱg%} PRON_36KWIK1 "_#gõ, #kkõ__kõ̭|iḱ_" ;

LEXICON PRON_27MITU
:u%{back%} Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:o%{back%} Harm_Neutr_SG_NOM ;
:m%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG_GEN ;
:m%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG_ALL_lE-STEM ;
+Sg+Par:und%{back%} K ;
:m%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_SG_ILL_he ;
:m%{back%}%>%{eõ%}  SG_ILL_hE ;
+Pl+Par:mit # ;
:m%{back%}%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_PL_NOM ;
:m%{back%}%>i Harm_Neutr_PL_GEN_dE ;
:m%{back%}%>i PL_ALL_lE-STEM ;

!! ### INTERROGATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-INTERR-HUM
+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP+Nom:iä # ;
+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP+Gen:ink # ;
+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP+Par:edä # ;
+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP+Com:inkaq # ;
+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:inka%{back%} PRON-INTERR_miae-ABE-ADE-ABL-ALL-ELA-ILL-INE-TRA ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_ABESUF ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_ABLSUF ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_ADESUF ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:el%{front%} NEUTR_ALLSUF_lE ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_ELASUF ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_ILLSUF_he ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:e%{front%} NEUTR_TRASUF ;

+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:inka%{back%} NEUTR_TERSUF ;
+Err/Dial+Sem/Hum+Interr+SP:eeniq TER_ZERO ;

LEXICON INDEF_kiq
:kiq ENDLEX ;
+Err/Orth-no-q:ki ENDLEX ;
LEXICON INDEF_giq
:giq ENDLEX ;
+Err/Orth-no-q:gi ENDLEX ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_miae
+Interr+SP:iä%{front%} NEUTR_NOMSUF ;
+Interr+SP+Err/Orth-est:is%{front%} NEUTR_NOMSUF ;
+Interr+SP:ink GEN_ZERO ;
+Interr+SP:i%{front%} NEUTR_PARSUF_dA ;
+Interr+SP:in NEUTR_COMSUF_kaq ;
+Interr+SP+Use/SpellNoSugg:in NEUTR_FOLLOW-CLITIC-OR-NOT_COMSUF_gaq ;
+Interr+SP:inka%{back%} NEUTR_TERSUF ;
+Interr+SP:ee%{front%} NEUTR_TERSUF ;
+Interr+SP:inka%{back%} PRON-INTERR_miae-ABE-ADE-ABL-ALL-ELA-ILL-INE-TRA ;
+Interr+SP:ii%{front%} PRON-INTERR_miae-ABE-ADE-ABL-ALL-ELA-ILL-INE-TRA ;
+Interr+SP+Ade:il%{front%} K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_miae-ABE-ADE-ABL-ALL-ELA-ILL-INE-TRA
 NEUTR_ABESUF ;
 NEUTR_ABLSUF ;
 NEUTR_ADESUF ;
 NEUTR_ALLSUF_lE ;
 NEUTR_ELASUF ;
 NEUTR_ILLSUF_he ;
 NEUTR_INESUF_N-H-HN ;
 NEUTR_TRASUF ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL_HINDAE
+Refl+Gen: K ;
+Refl+Par:%^Pen%^WGStem%>st K ;


LEXICON PRON_11LAETEQ
:%{front%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ ;

LEXICON PRON_13SAEAENE
:%{front%} NMN_13XX/SAEAENE ;

LEXICON PRON_13TAEHINE
:%{front%} NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE ;

LEXICON PRON_19PEDAEJAENE
:%{front%} NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE ;

LEXICON PRON_22NAANW
:%{back%} NMN_22NAANW ;

LEXICON PRON_22VWROKWNW
:%{back%} NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE ;

LEXICON PRON_22VAEHAEKENE
:%{front%} NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE ;

LEXICON PRON_29KUU
:%{back%} NMN_29KUU/HAEAE ;

LEXICON PRON_30MAA
:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE ;

!LEXICON PRON_35UMA
!:%{back%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE ;

LEXICON PRON_36KWIK1
:%{back%} NMN_36KWIK1/XX1 ;

LEXICON PRON_36UETS1 !!= * @CODE@ ütś:üt
 PRON_36UETS1-SG ;
 PRON_36UETS1_PL ;
LEXICON PRON_36UETS1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1-SG ;
LEXICON PRON_36UETS1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1_PL ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
