src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
hindä+Pron:hindä PRON-REFL_HINDAE  "" ;
kiä+Pron:k PRON-INTERR-HUM  "" ;
miä+Pron:m PRON-INTERR_miae  "" ;
